Utah statutes.
17-2-206.   Territory becomes part of annexing county -- Division of
revenues.
(1)  Upon the effective date of the annexation, all the area proposed to be
annexed shall become part of the annexing county.
(2) (a)  The legislative body of the initiating county shall:
(i)  until the date of annexation, continue:
(A)  to levy and collect ad valorem property tax and other revenues from or
pertaining to the area; and
(B)  except as otherwise agreed with the annexing county, to provide the same
services to the area proposed to be annexed as the initiating county provided
before the commencement of the annexation proceedings; and
(ii)  after annexation, share pro rata with the annexing county the taxes and
service charges or fees levied and collected by the initiating county during
the year of the annexation if and to the extent that the annexing county
provides, by itself or by contract, the same services for which the initiating
county levied and collected the taxes and service charges or fees.
(b)  The pro rata allocation of taxes under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) shall be
based on the date of annexation, and the pro rata allocation of service
charges and fees shall be based on the proportion of services related to the
service charges and fees that remain to be rendered after annexation.
